Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Interest Exchange.

Sec. 10.55.301.
Interest exchange authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

,

a domestic entity may acquire all of one or more classes or series of interests of another domestic or foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property; or

all of one or more classes or series of interests of a domestic entity may be acquired by another domestic or foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be the acquiring or acquired entity in an interest exchange under AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

if the interest exchange is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

Unless the provision is amended after July 1, 2014, if a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic entity but does not refer to an interest exchange, the provision applies to an interest exchange in which the domestic entity is the acquired entity as if the interest exchange were a merger.

The provisions of AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

do not apply to a share exchange under AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.582

or

10.06.960

. In this subsection, “share exchange” means a share exchange authorized by AS

10.06.538

or an exchange regulated by AS

10.06.960

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.302.
Plan of interest exchange.

A domestic entity may be the acquired entity in an interest exchange under AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

by approving a plan of interest exchange. The plan must be in a record and contain

the name and type of the acquired entity;

the name, jurisdiction of organization, and type of the acquiring entity;

the manner of converting the interests in the acquired entity into interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property;

any proposed amendments to the public organic document or private organic rules that are, or are proposed to be, in a record of the acquired entity;

the other terms and conditions of the interest exchange; and

any other provision required by the law of this state or the organic rules of the acquired entity.

A plan of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.303.
Approval of interest exchange.

A plan of interest exchange is not effective unless it has been approved

by a domestic acquired entity

in accordance with the requirements, if any, in the acquired entity’s organic law and organic rules for approval of an interest exchange;

except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, if neither the acquired entity’s organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of an interest exchange, in accordance with the requirements, if any, in the acquired entity’s organic law and organic rules for approval of,

in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger, as if the interest exchange were a merger; or

in the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation, as if the interest exchange were that type of merger; or

if neither its organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of an interest exchange or a merger described in (B)(ii) of this paragraph, by all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

in a record, by each interest holder of a domestic acquired entity that will have interest-holder liability for liabilities that arise after the interest exchange becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation,

the organic rules of the entity provide in a record for the approval of an interest exchange or a merger in which some or all of the entity’s interest holders become subject to interest-holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all of the interest holders; and

the interest holder voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

An interest exchange involving a foreign acquired entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

Except as otherwise provided in the acquiring entity’s organic law or organic rules, the interest holders of the acquiring entity are not required to approve the interest exchange.

A provision of the organic law of a domestic acquired entity that would permit a merger between the acquired entity and the acquiring entity to be approved without the vote or consent of the interest holders of the acquired entity because of the percentage of interests in the acquired entity held by the acquiring entity does not apply to approval of an interest exchange under (a)(1)(B) of this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.304.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of interest exchange.

A plan of interest exchange of a domestic acquired entity may be amended

in the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

by the governors or interest holders of the entity in the manner provided in the plan; however, an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the interest exchange is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change

the amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, to be received by any of the interest holders of the acquired entity under the plan;

the public organic document or private organic rules of the acquired entity that will be in effect immediately after the interest exchange becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the acquired entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the interest holder in any material respect.

After a plan of interest exchange has been approved by a domestic acquired entity and before a statement of interest exchange becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned

as provided in the plan; or

unless prohibited by the plan, in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of interest exchange is abandoned after a statement of interest exchange has been filed with the department and before the filing becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed on behalf of the acquired entity, must be filed with the department before the time the statement of interest exchange becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the interest exchange is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain

the name of the acquired entity;

the date on which the statement of interest exchange was filed; and

a statement that the interest exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.305.
Statement of interest exchange; effective date.

A statement of interest exchange shall be signed on behalf of a domestic acquired entity and filed with the department.

A statement of interest exchange must contain

the name and type of the acquired entity;

the name, jurisdiction of organization, and type of the acquiring entity;

if the statement of interest exchange is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing;

a statement that the plan of interest exchange was approved by the acquired entity in accordance with AS

10.55.301

—

10.55.306

; and

any amendments to the acquired entity’s public organic document approved as part of the plan of interest exchange.

In addition to the requirements of (b) of this section, a statement of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

A plan of interest exchange that is signed on behalf of a domestic acquired entity and meets all of the requirements of (b) of this section may be filed with the department instead of a statement of interest exchange and, on filing, has the same effect as a statement of interest exchange. If a plan of interest exchange is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this chapter to a statement of interest exchange refer to the plan of interest exchange filed under this subsection.

A statement of interest exchange becomes effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of interest exchange.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.306.
Effect of interest exchange.

When an interest exchange becomes effective,

the interests in the acquired entity that are the subject of the interest exchange cease to exist or are converted or exchanged, and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of interest exchange and to any dissenters’ rights they have under AS

10.55.109

and the acquired entity’s organic law;

the acquiring entity becomes the interest holder of the interests in the acquired entity stated in the plan of interest exchange to be acquired by the acquiring entity;

the public organic document, if any, of the acquired entity is amended as provided in the statement of interest exchange and is binding on the acquired entity’s interest holders; and

the private organic rules of the acquired entity that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of interest exchange and are binding on and enforceable by

the acquired entity’s interest holders; and

in the case of an acquired entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation, any other person that is a party to an agreement that is part of the acquired entity’s private organic rules.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of the acquired entity, the interest exchange does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would otherwise have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the acquired entity.

When an interest exchange becomes effective, a person that did not have interest-holder liability with respect to the acquired entity and that becomes subject to interest-holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the interest exchange has interest-holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those liabilities that arise after the interest exchange becomes effective.

When an interest exchange becomes effective, the interest-holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic acquired entity with respect to which the person had interest-holder liability is as follows:

the interest exchange does not discharge any interest-holder liability under the organic law of the domestic acquired entity to the extent the interest-holder liability arose before the interest exchange became effective;

the person does not have interest-holder liability under the organic law of the domestic acquired entity for any liability that arises after the interest exchange becomes effective;

the organic law of the domestic acquired entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the interest exchange had not occurred; and

the person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by the organic law or organic rules of the domestic acquired entity with respect to any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the interest exchange had not occurred.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)